Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-537
Waterworks; rules and regulations.

The city council of a city of the second class or village board of trustees shall have power to make and enforce all necessary rules and regulations in the construction, use, and management of waterworks, mains, portion, or extension of any system of waterworks or water supply and for the use of the water from such system.

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XV, p. 178;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XV, p. 169;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XV, p. 298;

Laws 1893, c. 8, § 1, p. 135;

Laws 1903, c. 21, § 1, p. 251;

Laws 1905, c. 30, § 1, p. 258;

Laws 1907, c. 17, § 1, p. 128;

R.S.1913, § 5119;

Laws 1917, c. 103, § 1, p. 272;

Laws 1919, c. 48, § 1, p. 139;

Laws 1919, c. 52, § 1, p. 152;

Laws 1919, c. 46, § 2, p. 133;

C.S.1922, § 4292;

Laws 1925, c. 41, § 1, p. 159;

C.S.1929, § 17-441;

Laws 1935, c. 34, § 1, p. 143;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-441;

R.S.1943, § 17-537;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 163.